Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.040

Supervisor of industrial safety and health—Appointment—Authority—Personnel.

The director of labor and industries shall appoint and deputize an assistant, to be known as the supervisor of industrial safety and health, who shall have authority to perform those duties delegated by the director and by statute.

The director may appoint and employ such inspectors, clerks, and other assistants as may be necessary to carry on the industrial safety and health work of the department.

[ 1994 c 164 s 5; 1973 1st ex.s. c 52 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.22.040. Prior: 1921 c 7 s 76; RRS s 10834.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 43.22.010.

Administrative expenses: RCW 51.16.105.